Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201860-4,128
Motorcycle operation without Class M license; penalty.

(1) Any person violating the provisions of section 60-4,127 shall be guilty of a traffic infraction and shall upon conviction thereof be fined not less than ten dollars nor more than one hundred dollars. In addition, a person operating a motorcycle without a Class M license may be required to complete the basic motorcycle safety course as provided in the Motorcycle Safety Education Act.

(2) For purposes of this section, motorcycle does not include an autocycle.

Laws 1971, LB 1041, § 1;

Laws 1975, LB 328, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-403.04;

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 78;

Laws 1990, LB 827, § 1;

Laws 2018, LB909, § 84.
April 12, 2018
Motorcycle Safety Education Act, see section 60-2120.